California statutes. Public Resources Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Emergency Regulatory Authority [42993.4. - 42993.4.]

42993.4.

(a) (1) The department may adopt emergency regulations to implement this chapter with regard to establishing a process for the submission of the used mattress recovery and recycling plan to the department, and the approval of that plan, pursuant to Section 42987.3 and for the submission of the proposed used mattress recycling program budget to the department, and the approval of the budget by the department, pursuant to Sections 42988 and 42988.1.

(2) The department shall not adopt emergency regulations pursuant to this section with regard to any other provision of this chapter.

(3) This section does not limit the department’s authority
 to adopt regulations pursuant to Section 40502.

(b) The emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for the purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any emergency regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this section shall be filed with the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 371, Sec. 10.   (SB 1274)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Antitrust Immunity [42994. - 42994.]

42994.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), an action specified in subdivision (b) that is taken by a mattress recycling organization or its members that relates to any of the following is not a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or the Unfair Competition Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code).

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to all of the following actions taken
 by the mattress recycling organization, manufacturer, or renovator:

(1) The creation, implementation, or management of a plan approved by the department pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 42987) and the types or quantities of used mattresses recycled or otherwise managed pursuant to a plan, as described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 42987).

(2) The cost and structure of an approved plan.

(3) The establishment, administration, collection, or disbursement of the charges associated with funding the implementation of this chapter.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to an agreement that does any of the following:

(1) Fixes a price of or for mattresses, except for an agreement related to costs or charges associated with participation in a plan
 approved or conditionally approved by the department and otherwise in accordance with this chapter.

(2) Fixes the output of production of mattresses.

(3) Restricts the geographic area in which, or customers to whom, mattresses will be sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   (SB 254)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 22. Waste Diversion and Greenhouse Gas Reduction Financial Assistance [42995. - 42999.7.]

42995.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Loan fund” means the CalRecycle Greenhouse Gas Reduction Revolving Loan Fund established pursuant to Section 42996.

(b) “Revolving loan program” means the CalRecycle Greenhouse Gas Reduction Revolving Loan Program established pursuant to Section 42997.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 36, Sec. 19.   (SB 862)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

42996.

(a) The CalRecycle Greenhouse Gas Reduction Revolving Loan Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code and Section 39718 of the Health and Safety Code, the funds deposited in the loan fund are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department for expenditure without regard to fiscal year.

(c) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby transferred from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, established pursuant to Section 16428.8 of the Government Code, to the loan fund for the 2014–15 fiscal year and an additional five million dollars
 ($5,000,000) for the 2015–16 fiscal year to be used by the department for any of the following:

(1) To make loans pursuant to the revolving loan program.

(2) To pay costs necessary to protect the state’s position as a lender and creditor. These costs shall include, but are not limited to, foreclosure expenses, auction fees, title searches, appraisals, real estate brokerage fees, attorney’s fees, mortgage payments, insurance payments, utility costs, repair costs, removal and storage costs for repossessed equipment and inventory, and additional expenditures to purchase a senior lien in foreclosure or bankruptcy proceedings.

(3) To pay costs to administer the revolving loan program, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(d) The Controller shall disburse
 moneys in the loan fund for the purposes of this chapter, as authorized by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 36, Sec. 19.   (SB 862)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

42997.

(a) The CalRecycle Greenhouse Gas Reduction Revolving Loan Program is hereby established and shall be administered by the department.

(b) (1) The department shall expend the moneys transferred pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 42996, and any additional moneys appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of this subdivision, to provide loans to reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases by promoting in-state development of infrastructure or other projects to reduce organic waste or process organic and other recyclable materials into new value-added products. The moneys shall be expended consistent with the requirements of Article 9.7 (commencing with Section 16428.8) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of
 Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 39710) of Part 2 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) For a loan made pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall expend the moneys in the loan fund to provide loans to public and private entities for in-state infrastructure projects or other projects that reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases by any of the following:

(A) Organics composting.

(B) Organics in-vessel digestion.

(C) Recyclable material manufacturing.

(D) Activities that expand and improve waste diversion and recycling, including, but not limited to, food waste prevention.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, eligible infrastructure projects that reduce greenhouse gas emissions include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Capital investments in new facilities and increased throughput at existing facilities for activities, such as converting windrow composting to aerated-static-pile composting to use food waste as feedstock.

(B) Designing and constructing organics in-vessel digestion facilities to produce products, such as biofuels, bioenergy, and soil amendments.

(C) Designing and constructing facilities for processing recyclable materials.

(4) For a loan made pursuant to this subdivision, both of the following apply:

(A) The terms and conditions of an approved loan shall be specified in a loan agreement and related documents between the borrower and the department. These terms and conditions shall include reporting requirements that include, but are not limited to, reporting the information specified in Section 16428.9 of the Government Code.

(B) The department shall approve only those loan applications that demonstrate the applicant’s ability to repay the loan.

(5) The department may establish additional requirements that it determines to be necessary or useful to achieve the revolving loan program’s objectives, including, but not limited to, ensuring repayment ability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 368, Sec. 12.   (SB 859)   Effective September 14, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

42998.

(a) The department may establish and collect fees to fund the costs of administering the revolving loan program, including, but not limited to, an application fee and loan closing points.

(b) Moneys collected by the department from loan repayments and fees shall be deposited in the loan fund. Loan repayments and fees include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Principal and interest repayments.

(2) Fees and loan closing points.

(3) Recovery of collection costs.

(4) Income earned on an asset recovered pursuant to a loan default.

(5) Moneys collected through foreclosure and other collection actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 36, Sec. 19.   (SB 862)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

42999.

(a) The department shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, administer a grant program to provide financial assistance to promote in-state development of infrastructure, food waste prevention, or other projects to reduce organic waste, sort and aggregate or process organic and other recyclable materials into new, value-added products, or divert items from disposal through enhanced reuse opportunities. Moneys appropriated by the Legislature from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, created pursuant to Section 16428.8 of the Government Code, to the department shall be expended consistent with the requirements of Article 9.7 (commencing with Section 16428.8) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 39710) of Part 2 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(b) Eligible financial assistance shall be provided for any of the following:

(1) Organics composting.

(2) Organics in-vessel digestion.

(3) Recyclable material manufacturing.

(4) Activities that expand and improve organic waste diversion and recycling, including, but not limited to, the recovery of food for human consumption and food waste prevention.

(5) Preprocessing organic materials for composting or organics in-vessel digestion.

(6) Codigestion at existing wastewater treatment plants.

(7) Increasing opportunities for reuse of materials diverted from landfill disposal.

(8) Recyclable material recovery, sorting, or baling equipment for use at publicly owned facilities. Eligibility for funding under this paragraph is limited to local jurisdictions.

(c) For purposes of this section, eligible infrastructure projects include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Capital investments in new facilities and increased throughput at existing facilities for activities, such as converting windrow composting to aerated-static-pile composting to use food waste as feedstock.

(2) Designing and constructing organics in-vessel digestion facilities to produce products, such as biofuels to be used or distributed onsite,
 bioenergy, and soil amendments.

(3) Designing and constructing or expanding facilities for processing recyclable materials.

(4) Projects to improve the quality of recycled materials.

(5) Projects undertaken by a local government at publicly owned facilities to improve the recovery, sorting, or baling of recyclable materials to get those materials into the marketplace, including related equipment purchasing and installation costs.

(6) Purchase of equipment and construction of facilities to help develop, implement, or expand edible food waste recovery operations.

(7) Establishment of reuse programs to divert items from landfill disposal for reuse by members of the public.

(8) Deployment of bear bins to minimize adverse human-and-bear interactions related to the collection and management of solid and organic waste. Any funding provided pursuant to this paragraph shall be limited to those areas where there are significant public safety issues associated with food waste collection as a result of local bear populations, as corroborated by information from local, state, or federal public safety or wildlife officials, and shall be limited to the primary residence for those residents earning below the area median household income limit established by the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) In awarding a grant for organics composting or organics in-vessel digestion pursuant to this section, the department shall consider all of the following:

(1) The amount of reductions of emissions of greenhouse gases that may result from the project.

(2) The amount of organic material that may be diverted from landfills as a result of the project.

(3) If and how the project may benefit disadvantaged or low-income communities, as defined in Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) For a grant awarded for an organics in-vessel digestion project, if and how the project maximizes resource recovery, including the production of clean energy or low-carbon or carbon negative transportation fuels.

(5) Project readiness and permitting that the project may require.

(6) Air and water
 quality benefits that the project may provide.

(e) To the degree that funds are available, the department may provide larger grant awards for large-scale regional integrated projects that provide cost-effective organic waste diversion and maximize environmental benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 176.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42999.5.

(a) The department shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, establish and administer the Zero-Waste Equity Grant Program as a competitive grant program to support targeted strategies and investments in communities transitioning to a zero-waste circular economy.

(b) Within a year of the appropriation, the department shall conduct at least two public workshops. After
 conducting the two public workshops, the department shall prepare and adopt guidelines and procedures for evaluating competitive grant applications. The department shall provide an online virtual option for participation in the public workshops. The department shall provide a 30-day notice for each public workshop and consult with interested parties, including affected residents, cities, counties, solid waste haulers, and nonprofit organizations in developing guidelines and procedures.

(c) Entities eligible for grants include any combination of the following:

(1) Local public agencies.

(2) Cities or counties.

(3) Nonprofit organizations.

(4) Qualifying tribal entities.

(d) In evaluating a grant application, the department shall prioritize communities most impacted by transformation or that contribute to significant amounts of transformation. In doing so, the department shall consider the following:

(1) A community’s proximity to a transformation facility that was in operation on January 1, 2018.

(2) The potential amount of solid waste that is expected to be diverted from transformation facilities through the proposed project.

(3) A community’s proximity to an EMSW facility.

(e) The funding appropriated for the Zero-Waste Equity Grant Program shall be used to fund programs that result in the reuse, repair, and sharing of goods and materials, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Projects that promote the recovery and exchange of household goods, food, clothing, and building materials, such as resource recovery parks.

(2) Projects that repair and extend the life of products, such as electronics, textiles, and furniture.

(3) Projects that facilitate the use and sharing of infrequently used items, such as tools, equipment, books, and other household items.

(4) Projects that promote reusable containers and package-free products and stores.

(f) Grants shall not be provided pursuant to this section for a project that will result in combustion,
 incineration, energy generation, and fuel production, or any other form of disposal, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 40192.

(g) (1) No later than six months after the conclusion of the funding cycle, the department shall post on its internet website and submit to the Legislature a report on all eligible zero-waste projects funded, including the amount awarded to each project and estimated amount of waste diverted from transformation facilities and landfills by each project, and opportunities for further investments in local zero-waste strategies in communities seeking to reduce their reliance on transformation facilities and landfills.

(2) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in
 compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) The department shall not expend more than 5 percent for administrative costs annually related to the Zero-Waste Equity Grant Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 342, Sec. 8.   (AB 1857)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42999.7.

Within two years of the appropriation by the Legislature for the Zero-Waste Equity Grant Program, the department, in consultation with the California Workforce Development Board and the Department of Industrial Relations shall submit policy recommendations to the Legislature
 on how to increase job opportunities and improve labor standards and worker pay related to the zero-waste job sector, including apprenticeship and job training programs that promote industry-recognized skills and credentials, and career technical education, and identify occupational hazards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 342, Sec. 9.   (AB 1857)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. SOLID WASTE FACILITIES [43000. - 44820.]



  CHAPTER 1. Solid Waste Facility Standards [43000. - 43050.]



  ARTICLE 1. Landfill Facility Requirements [43000. - 43000.]

43000.

The following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Waste management unit” means the area of a solid waste landfill facility in or on which solid wastes are placed for disposal.

(b) “New waste management unit” means a waste management unit which is not authorized on or before January 1, 1990, under waste discharge provisions adopted on or before that date pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code and for which a solid waste facility permit was not issued on or before that date pursuant to Title 7.3 (commencing with Section 66700) of the Government Code as it read before January 1, 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Handling and Disposal Standards [43020. - 43035.]

43020.

The board shall adopt and revise regulations which set forth minimum standards for solid waste handling, transfer, composting, transformation, and disposal, in accordance with this division, and Section 117590 of, and Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of, the Health and Safety Code. The board shall not include any requirements that are already under the authority of the State Air Resources Board for the prevention of air pollution or of the state water board for the prevention of water pollution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 405.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

43020.1.

(a) As part of the existing regulatory review process for regulations adopted pursuant to this article, the board may consider whether the operational requirements that apply to nonhazardous wood waste landfills should differ from the operational requirements that apply to other categories of solid waste landfills, such as those used for the disposal of municipal solid waste. If the board determines that the operational requirements that apply to nonhazardous wood waste landfills should differ from the operational requirements that apply to other categories of solid waste landfills, such as those used for the disposal of municipal solid waste, the board shall revise its regulations accordingly.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “nonhazardous wood waste landfill” means a landfill that exclusively accepts untreated bark, sawdust, shavings, and chips that are the byproducts of primary wood product manufacturing and processes that are not used as raw material and that are destined for disposal. “Nonhazardous wood waste landfill” does not include any landfill that accepts chemically treated or adulterated bark, sawdust, shavings, and chips that are the byproducts of primary wood product manufacturing and processes that are not used as raw material and that are destined for disposal.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to authorize the board to adopt regulations which are less stringent than those adopted by the Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Part 256 (commencing with Section 256.01) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1035, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43021.

Regulations shall include standards for the design, operation, maintenance, and ultimate reuse of solid waste facilities, but shall not include aspects of solid waste handling or disposal which are solely of local concern or which are within the jurisdiction of the State Air Resources Board, air pollution control districts and air quality management districts, or the state water board or regional water boards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 9.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43022.

(a) The open burning of solid waste, except for the infrequent burning of agricultural wastes, silvicultural wastes, landclearing debris, diseased trees, or debris from emergency cleanup operations, is prohibited at any solid waste facility.

(b) The owners and operators of solid waste facilities shall comply with subdivision (a) on and after the effective date of the federal regulations set forth in Subpart C (commencing with Section 258.20) of Part 258 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 289, Sec. 1.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43030.

(a) The board shall adopt regulations that are consistent with Section 40055 governing the monitoring and control of the subsurface migration of landfill gas.

(b) The board shall consult with the state water board, the State Air Resources Board, and the California Air Pollution Control Officers Association to ensure that the regulations do not conflict with any regulations adopted by the state water board and the State Air Resources Board or air pollution control districts and air quality management districts.

(c) The regulations adopted by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall establish monitoring and control standards, based on the potential of the waste to generate landfill gas, as determined by the board, and shall require owners and operators of disposal sites or disposal facilities to report monitoring data and to perform, or cause to be performed, site inventories and evaluations of disposal sites or disposal facilities for the subsurface migration of landfill gas.

(d) If an owner or operator of a disposal site or disposal facility is in compliance with requirements of the air pollution control district or the air quality management district within whose jurisdiction the disposal site or disposal facility is located, the owner or operator shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section and with any regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this section. However, owners or operators of disposal sites and disposal facilities shall be required to comply with regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this section, which impose requirements not addressed by the requirements of the air pollution control district or the air quality management district within whose jurisdiction the disposal site or disposal facility is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1038, Sec. 32.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

43035.

(a) The board, in cooperation with the Office of Emergency Services, shall develop an integrated waste management disaster plan to provide for the handling, storage, processing, transportation, and diversion from disposal sites, or provide for disposal at a disposal site where absolutely necessary, of solid waste, resulting from a state of emergency or a local emergency, as defined, respectively, in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 8558 of the Government Code.

(b) The board may adopt regulations, including emergency regulations, necessary to carry out the integrated waste management disaster plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 492.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Financial Responsibility [43040. - 43040.]

43040.

(a) The board shall adopt standards and regulations requiring that, as a condition for the issuance, modification, revision, or review of a solid waste facilities permit for a disposal facility, the operator of the disposal facility shall provide assurance of adequate financial ability to respond to personal injury claims and public or private property damage claims resulting from the operations of the disposal facility which occur before closure.

(b) To the extent practicable and consistent with federal law and regulations, the board and the state water board shall, on or before January 1, 1994, develop a work plan for combining financial assurance requirements for operating liability with financial assurance requirements for corrective actions into one mechanism which provides appropriate coverage for both purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 11.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Long-Term Threats to Landfills [43050. - 43050.]

43050.

(a) On or before January 1, 2008, the board shall conduct a study to define the conditions that potentially affect solid waste landfills, including technologies and engineering controls designed to mitigate potential risks, in order to identify potential long-term threats to public health and safety and the environment. The board shall also study various financial assurance mechanisms that would protect the state from long-term postclosure and corrective action costs in the event that a landfill owner or operator fails to meet its legal obligations to fund postclosure maintenance or corrective action during the postclosure period. The board, on or before July 1, 2009, shall adopt regulations and develop recommendations for needed legislation to implement the findings of the study.

(b) In conducting the study described in subdivision (a), the board shall consult with representatives of the League of California Cities, the County Supervisors Association of California, private and public waste services, and environmental organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 504, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. The Solid Waste Disposal Regulatory Reform Act of 1993 [43100. - 43103.]

43100.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Solid Waste Disposal Regulatory Reform Act of 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 12.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43101.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares as follows:

(a) The board and the state water board have submitted a report entitled Joint Report: Reforming the California Solid Waste Disposal Regulatory Process, and have recommended legislation to the Governor and the Legislature that identifies areas of regulatory overlap, conflict, and duplication and makes recommendations for change.

(b) The report found that regulatory overlap, conflict, and duplication were evident between the board and the state water board and between the board and local enforcement agencies and that regulatory reform was necessary to streamline the state’s solid waste disposal regulatory process. In addition, it was found that a recasting of the solid waste facilities permit was warranted to make more efficient and streamlined the permitting and regulation of solid waste disposal facilities. The report also makes numerous other appropriate recommendations for improving the manner in which the management of solid waste is regulated by the state which require immediate legislative response.

(c) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, and in making the necessary revisions to this division and Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code by the act enacting this chapter, to accomplish all of the following:

(1) As provided by Sections 40054 and 40055, the board, the state water board, and the regional water boards shall retain their appropriate statutory authority over solid waste disposal facilities and sites. A clear and concise division of authority shall be maintained in both statute and regulation to remove all areas of overlap, duplication, and conflict between the board and the state water board and regional water boards, or between the board and any other state agency, as appropriate.

(2) The state water board and regional water boards shall be the sole agencies regulating the disposal and classification of solid waste for the purpose of protecting the waters of the state, consistent with Section 40055, and the board and the certified local enforcement agencies shall regulate all other aspects of solid waste disposal within the scope of their appropriate regulatory authority.

(3) To effectuate that clear division of authority, the board and the state water board shall develop one consolidated set of solid waste disposal facility regulations where distinct chapters are written and implemented by the appropriate agency, and one consolidated permit application, including one technical report to incorporate the requirements of both the solid waste facilities permit and waste discharge requirements.

(4) The process and timeframe for the review and approval of the consolidated application shall be revised to allow, to the greatest extent feasible, for the concurrent development and review of the waste discharge requirements and the solid waste facilities permit. The intent of this permit streamlining effort is to shorten the overall timeframe for processing a permit and to accommodate concurrent reviews by the local enforcement agency and the regional water boards within a set timeframe.

(5) Any details of a concurrent permit approval process shall be worked out in an implementation plan that is developed jointly by the board and state water board with input from interested parties.

(6) If practicable, joint inspections of facilities shall be conducted by the board, regional water boards, and local enforcement agencies, and inspection reports shall be shared with any other affected state or local agency.

(7) The closure and postclosure maintenance requirements of the board and the state water board for solid waste landfills shall be combined into one set of consolidated regulations which require one closure and postclosure maintenance plan to be prepared for each solid waste landfill.

(8) A clear and concise division of responsibilities shall be maintained to minimize overlap and duplication of permitting, inspection, and compliance duties between the board and certified local enforcement agencies. The board’s primary role in regard to permitting and compliance shall be to provide technical assistance and ongoing training and support to local enforcement agencies, to ensure a local enforcement agency’s performance in complying with state minimum standards, and to review permits and other documents submitted by local enforcement agencies for board concurrence or approval. The board shall strengthen the state certification and evaluation program for local enforcement agencies and shall set clear and uniform standards to be met by local enforcement agencies.

(9) The Solid Waste Disposal Site Cleanup and Maintenance Account shall be abolished and a solid waste disposal fee established for deposit in the Integrated Waste Management Account which provides adequate funding for all obligations imposed pursuant to this division. In addition, the costs of the state water board and the regional water boards of regulating solid waste facilities shall be funded from the account.

(10) The Solid Waste Assessment Test Program shall continue operating with resources from the Integrated Waste Management Account until all of the ranked solid waste disposal sites are reviewed.

(11) Responsibility for establishing and enforcing financial responsibility requirements for solid waste landfills, from operation through to cleanup, shall, to the greatest extent practicable and consistent with applicable federal law, be consolidated into one set of regulations administered by the board, in consultation with the state water board.

(12) At a minimum, the financial assurance requirements for closure and postclosure maintenance shall be combined, and the requirements for corrective action and operating liability shall be reviewed, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 43040, to determine if there can be further consolidation of financial assurance requirements for solid waste landfills.

(13) The state water board or the appropriate regional water board shall have access to the financial assurance funds for closure and postclosure activities and to financial assurance funds for corrective action, as necessary, to address water quality problems, if the owner or operator has failed to implement the required closure and postclosure activities or corrective action activities.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, and in making the necessary revisions to this division and Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code, to ensure that the state minimum standards for environmental protection at solid waste disposal facilities are not reduced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 12.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43102.

On or before July 1, 1994, the board and the state water board shall jointly develop a plan to implement the changes made to this division and Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code by the act adding this chapter, and shall make recommendations for additional reforms to both statutory law and regulations, which are consistent with the intent specified in Section 43101. In developing an implementation plan, the board and the state water board shall seek the active participation of representatives of local government, other state agencies, the regulated community, environmental organizations, and interested parties. At a minimum, the implementation plan shall include a work plan for revising regulations, a timeline for implementation, and a description of necessary administrative actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 12.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43103.

The board and the state water board shall adopt regulations for the implementation of the changes required by this chapter, and the act adding this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 12.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Solid Waste Handling and Disposal [43200. - 43610.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. Local Enforcement Agencies [43200. - 43222.]

43200.

(a) The board shall prepare and adopt certification regulations for local enforcement agencies. The regulations shall specify requirements that a local agency shall meet before being designated as an enforcement agency. The regulations shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Technical expertise.

(2) (A) Adequacy of staff resources.

(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, the board shall adopt regulations for specified enforcement agencies, as defined in subparagraph (C), which meet all of the following requirements:

(i) The regulations shall not require a specific number of person-hours or staff resources for the performance of duties as a specified enforcement agency.

(ii) The regulations shall establish performance standards for specified enforcement agencies which will provide a comparable level of public health and safety and environmental protection to that required of other local agencies certified pursuant to this article.

(iii) The regulations shall establish procedures to ensure that all duties required of specified enforcement agencies pursuant to this article are actually performed.

(iv) The regulations shall require specified enforcement agency personnel to receive a comparable level of training to that required of personnel employed by other local agencies certified pursuant to this article.

(C) For the purposes of subparagraph (B), “specified enforcement agency” means a local enforcement agency which has a population of less than 50,000 persons.

(3) Adequacy of budget resources.

(4) Training requirements.

(5) The existence of at least one permitted solid waste facility within the jurisdiction of the local agency. For the purposes of this paragraph, “permitted solid waste facility” includes a proposed solid waste facility for which an environmental impact report or negative declaration has been prepared and certified pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) or for which a conditional use permit has been issued by a city or county.

(b) The regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall specify four separate types of certifications for which an enforcement agency may be designated, as follows:

(1) Permitting, inspection, and enforcement of regulations at solid waste landfills.

(2) Permitting, inspection, and enforcement of solid waste incinerators.

(3) Permitting, inspection, and enforcement of transfer and processing stations.

(4) Inspection and enforcement of litter, odor, and nuisance regulations at solid waste landfills.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 665, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

43200.5.

(a) An enforcement agency that has been designated by the local governing body and certified by the department pursuant to this chapter has the authority provided, and the duties required, by this part, Part 5 (commencing with Section 45000), and Part 6 (commencing with Section 45030).

(b) When exercising the authority and fulfilling the duties specified in subdivision (a), an enforcement agency is deemed to be carrying out a state function that is governed by this division. In carrying out this state function, an enforcement agency is deemed to be independent from the local governing body, and the enforcement agency’s actions in carrying out this state function is not subject to the authority of the local governing body.
